Wisconsin, session 2025, AB977.
do enact as follows:AB977,11Section 1. 20.370 (9) (hu) of the statutes is amended to read:AB977,2,9220.370 (9) (hu) Handling and other fees. All moneys received by the 3department as provided under ss. 23.33 (2) (i), (ig), and (o) and (2j) (f) 4., 23.335 (4) 4(hm) and (5) (h), 29.2297, 29.556, 30.52 (1m) (a), (ag), and (e) and (3) (k), 30.537 (4) 5(g), and 350.12 (3) (f), (3h) (a), (ag), and (g), and (3j) (e) 4., excluding fees under s. 630.52 (1m) (a) for the issuance of an original certificate of number or registration for 7a nonmotorized boat that is not a sailboat, for the issuing of department and federal 8approvals under ch. 29 and for the issuing and renewing of certificates and 9registrations by the department.AB977,210Section 2. 30.51 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB977,2,121130.51 (2) (a) 1. A nonmotorized boat which that is not a sailboat and in which 12one occupant holds a valid fishing license under ch. 29.AB977,313Section 3. 30.51 (2) (a) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB977,2,151430.51 (2) (a) 1m. A nonmotorized boat that is not a sailboat and that is 15operated within a vehicle admission area, as defined in s. 27.01 (7) (a) 3.AB977,2,1616